New York, session 2025-2026, A4019.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 15 of section 201 of the workers' compensation 2 law, as added by section 2 of part SS of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 15. "Family leave" shall mean any leave taken by an employee from 5 work: (a) to participate in providing care, including physical or 6 psychological care and individualized education program (IEP) meetings, 7 for a family member of the employee made necessary by a serious health 8 condition of the family member; or (b) to bond with the employee's child 9 during the first twelve months after the child's birth, or the first 10 twelve months after the placement of the child for adoption or foster 11 care with the employee; or (c) because of any qualifying exigency as 12 interpreted under the family and medical leave act, 29 U.S.C.S § 13 2612(a)(1)(e) and 29 C.F.R. S.825.126(a)(1)-(8), arising out of the fact 14 that the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent of the employee is 15 on active duty (or has been notified of an impending call or order to 16 active duty) in the armed forces of the United States. For purposes of 17 this subdivision, care for a family member of the employee made neces- 18 sary by a serious health condition shall include up to three hours of 19 attendance for each individualized education program (IEP) meeting. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06193-01-5